Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2637
Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Cash Fund is created. The department shall administer the fund for purposes of the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Act. The fund may consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature and any gifts, grants, bequests, or donations to the fund.

(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 41.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.